District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Washington Commanders Motor Vehicle Identification Tags
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title IV of the District of Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, approved August 17,
1937 (50 Stat. 679; D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) A new section 2p is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 2p. Issuance of Washington Commanders motor vehicle identification tags.
“(a) The Mayor may design and make available for issue one or more Washington
Commanders motor vehicle identification tags to demonstrate support for the Washington
Commanders football team.
“(b)(1) A resident ordering a Washington Commanders tag shall pay a one-time
application fee and a display fee each year thereafter. The application fee shall be $25, and the
display fee shall be $20, or such other amounts as the Mayor may establish by rule.
“(2) The application and annual display fees shall be deposited into the State
Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund, established by section 4033 of the State Athletic
Activities, Programs, and Office Fund Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-
61; D.C. Official Code § 38-2672).”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.03) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (T) to read as
follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(T) Any person ordering a Washington Commanders motor vehicle
identification tag shall pay the fees set forth in section 2p(b)(1).”.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (16) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (17) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (18) is added to read as follows:
“(18) The fees collected for the Washington Commanders motor vehicle identification
tag under section 2p shall be deposited into the State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office
Fund, established by section 4033 of the State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund
Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 38-2672).”.
Sec. 3. Section 4033(c) of the State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund Act of
2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 38-2672(c)), is
amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (2)(E) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(b) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) All fees collected pursuant to section 2p(b)(1) of Title IV of the District of
Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, passed on 2nd reading on September 22, 2026 (Enrolled version
of Bill 26-548).”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3